en: Baby & Toddler > Baby Transport Accessories: Baby & Toddler Car Seat Accessories; Baby Carrier Accessories; Baby Stroller Accessories; Baby Transport Liners & Sacks; Shopping Cart & High Chair Covers
ja: ベビー用品 > ベビー用外出小物: チャイルドシート関連用品; 抱っこひも関連用品; ベビーカー関連用品; ベビーカー・チャイルドシート用フットマフ; ショッピングカート・ハイチェア用カバー
zh-CN: 婴幼儿用品 > 婴幼儿出行用品配件: 婴幼儿汽车座椅配件; 婴儿背带配件; 婴儿推车配件; 婴幼儿出行垫和护腿袋; 宝宝购物车/餐椅坐垫
sk-SK: Bábätká > Príslušenstvo na prepravu detí: Príslušenstvo k dojčenskej autosedačke; Príslušenstvo k detským nosičom; Príslušenstvo k detským kočíkom; Vložky a vaky na prepravu detí; Poťahy do nákupného košíka a na vysoké stoličky
pt-PT: Bebé e criança > Acessórios de transporte para bebé: Acessórios de cadeirinhas automóveis para bebé e criança; Acessórios de transportadoras de bebé; Acessórios de carrinhos de passeio para bebé; Forros e alcofas para transporte do bebé; Coberturas para carrinho de compras e cadeiras de refeição
ro-RO: Bebeluși și copii mici > Accesorii pentru transportul bebelușilor: Accesorii scaun auto pentru bebeluși și copii mici; Accesorii pentru marsupiu; Accesorii pentru cărucioare pentru copii; Căptușeli și saci pentru articolele de transport pentru copii; Huse pentru coș de cumpărături și scaune înalte
nl: Baby en peuter > Accessoires voor vervoeren van baby's: Accessoires voor kinderzitjes voor baby's en peuters; Accessoires voor babyvervoer; Accessoires voor wandelwagens; Voetenzakken voor baby's; Kussentjes voor winkelwagens en kinderstoelen
hu: Baba- és csecsemő > Babaszállítási kiegészítők: Baba és csecsemő autósülés-kiegészítők; Babahordozó-kiegészítők; Babakocsi-kiegészítők; Babaszállító betétek és zsákok; Bevásárlókosár- és etetőszék-huzatok
cs: Děti a kojenci > Přeprava dětí – příslušenství: Doplňky k dětským a kojeneckým autosedačkám; Doplňky k nosítkům pro děti; Doplňky k dětským kočárkům; Dětské přepravní vaky a vložky; Kryty na nákupní vozíky a vysoké židle
pt-BR: Infantil > Acessórios para transporte de bebês: Acessórios para cadeiras de bebê para automóvel; Acessórios para cangurus; Acessórios para carrinho de bebê; Revestimentos e sacos de dormir para transporte de bebês; Capas para carrinhos de compras e cadeirinhas de bebê
vi: Trẻ sơ sinh và trẻ tập đi > Xe đẩy trẻ em: Phụ kiện ghế ngồi ô tô dành cho trẻ sơ sinh và trẻ nhỏ; Phụ kiện địu bé; Phụ kiện xe đẩy trẻ em; Đệm lót và túi ủ trẻ em; Bọc ghế ngồi trẻ em
ru: Товары для детей > Аксессуары для детских автокресел, переносок и колясок: Аксессуары для детских автокресел; Аксессуары для детских переносок; Аксессуары для детских колясок; Вкладыши для колясок и автокресел; Вкладыши для детских стульчиков и тележек для покупок
lt-LT: Kūdikiai ir maži vaikai > Kūdikių transportavimo priemonių priedai: Automobilinių kėdučių kūdikiams ir mažiems vaikams priedai; Kūdikių nešynių priedai; Kūdikių vežimėlių priedai; Kūdikių vežimo įdėklai ir maišeliai; Pirkinių krepšelių ir aukštų kėdučių užvalkalai
es: Bebés y niños pequeños > Accesorios para el transporte de bebés: Accesorios de sillas de coche para bebés y niños; Accesorios para cargadores de bebés; Accesorios de carritos para bebés; Mantas y sacos para el transporte de bebés; Fundas para tronas y carros de la compra
th: ทารกและเด็กเล็ก > อุปกรณ์เคลื่อนย้ายเด็กอ่อน: อุปกรณ์ที่นั่งในรถสำหรับเด็กและทารก; อุปกรณ์เคลื่อนย้ายเด็กทารก; อุปกรณ์รถเข็นเด็ก; เบาะและถุงเคลื่อนย้ายเด็กอ่อน; ที่รองรถเข็นช็อปปิ้งและเก้าอี้ขายาว
bg-BG: Бебета и малки деца > Бебешки транспортни аксесоари: Аксесоари за столчета за кола за бебета и малки деца; Аксесоари за бебеносещи средства; Аксесоари за бебешки колички; Подложки и чувалчета; Подложки за пазарска количка и високи столчета
nb: Baby og barn > Tilbehør for babytransport: Tilbehør til bilseter for baby og barn; Tilbehør for bæreseler; Tilbehør for babyvogner; Trekk og poser for babytransport; Trekk for handlevogner og babystoler
hr-HR: Bebe i mala djeca > Pribor za prijevoz beba: Dodaci za autosjedalice za bebe i malu djecu; Dodaci za nosiljke za bebe; Dodaci za dječja kolica; Podloge i vreće za prijevoz beba; Podloge za trgovačka kolica i visoke stolice
fi: Vauvat ja leikki-ikäiset > Vauvan kuljetustarvikkeet: Vauvan ja leikki-ikäisen turvaistuimen lisätarvikkeet; Vauvan kantolaitteen lisävarusteet; Vauvan vaunujen lisävarusteet; Vauvan kuljetusvälineiden suojat ja pussit; Ostoskärryn ja syöttötuolin peitteet
pl: Dzieci i niemowlęta > Akcesoria do transportu niemowląt: Akcesoria do fotelików samochodowych dla niemowląt i dzieci starszych; Akcesoria do nosidełek dla niemowląt; Akcesoria do wózków dla niemowląt; Materacyki i śpiwory do wózków i fotelików; Pokrowce do wózków sklepowych i krzesełek do karmienia
sl-SI: Dojenčki in malčki > Dodatki za prevoz otrok: Dodatki za avtosedeže za dojenčke in malčke; Dodatki za otroške nosilke; Dodatki za otroške vozičke; Podloge in vreče za prevoz otrok; Prevleke za nakupovalne vozičke in stolčke za hranjenje
it: Bebè e bimbi > Accessori trasporto bebè: Accessori seggiolini auto; Accessori marsupio; Accessori per passeggini; Sacche e fodere per il trasporto di bambini; Rivestimenti per sedili dei carrelli della spesa e seggioloni
da: Baby og småbørn > Babytransport – tilbehør: Baby og småbørn – bilsædetilbehør; Babybæreseler – tilbehør; Babyklapvogn – tilbehør; Køreposer; Hynder til barnesæde i indkøbsvogn eller højstol
fr: Bébés et tout-petits > Accessoires de transport pour bébés: Accessoires de siège auto pour bébés et tout-petits; Accessoires pour porte-bébés; Accessoires de poussette pour bébés; Nids d’ange et chancelières; Protection de chariot et housses pour chaises hautes
de: Baby & Kleinkind > Babytransportzubehör: Zubehör für Baby- & Kleinkindautositze; Zubehör für Babyträger; Zubehör für Kinderwagen; Fußsäcke; Einkaufswagen- & Hochstuhlbezüge
el: Βρεφικά & παιδικά είδη > Αξεσουάρ μεταφοράς μωρών: Αξεσουάρ βρεφικού/παιδικού καθίσματος αυτοκινήτου; Αξεσουάρ για μάρσιπους; Αξεσουάρ για καρότσια; Επένδυση και σάκοι μεταφοράς για βρέφη; Καλύμματα για καρότσια αγορών & καρεκλάκια φαγητού
tr: Bebek ve Küçük Çocuk Ürünleri > Bebek Taşıma Aksesuarları: Bebek ve Küçük Çocuk Oto Koltuğu Aksesuarları; Kanguru Aksesuarları; Bebek Arabası Aksesuarları; Bebek Arabası Örtüleri ve Tulumları; Alışveriş Arabası ve Mama Sandalyesi Kılıfları
zh-TW: 嬰幼兒 > 嬰兒外出用品配件: 嬰幼兒安全椅配件; 嬰兒背巾配件; 嬰兒推車配件; 嬰兒車椅墊/披肩; 購物車墊和高腳椅墊
sv: Baby och småbarn > Tillbehör till barntransport: Tillbehör till bilbarnstolar; Tillbehör till bärselar; Tillbehör till barnvagnar; Åkpåsar för barntransport; Skydd för barnvagnar och barnstolar
ko: 영유아 > 영유아용 캐리어 부대용품: 영유아 카시트 부대용품; 아기띠 부대용품; 유모차 부대용품; 영유아용 캐리어 시트/패드; 쇼핑카트/유아용 식탁 의자 커버